Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.070

Recognizance to maintain good behavior or keep the peace.

Every court before whom any person shall be convicted upon an indictment or information for an offense not punishable with death or imprisonment in the penitentiary may, in addition to the punishment prescribed by law, require such person to recognize with sufficient sureties in a reasonable sum to keep the peace, or to be of good behavior, or both, for any term not exceeding one year, and to stand committed until he or she shall so recognize.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1057; 1891 c 28 s 83; Code 1881 s 1121; 1873 p 242 s 279; 1854 p 123 s 143; RRS s 2202. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1122; 1873 p 242 s 280; 1854 p 123 s 144; RRS s 2203, now codified as RCW 10.64.075.]